New York, session 2025-2026, A110.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 14-129 of the administrative code of the city of 2 New York is amended by adding a new subdivision c to read as follows: 3 c. The one hundred ninth precinct shall be divided into two separate 4 subdivisions, one subdivision representing "Flushing South", and the 5 other representing the "North Shore - College Point, Whitestone, Clear- 6 view and Bay Terrace". All corresponding boundaries shall be determined 7 by the commissioner, in accordance with the regulations of the depart- 8 ment, whereupon, the department shall allocate such resources necessary 9 to establish and support both precinct subdivisions. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 11 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00811-01-5